Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6094.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6bb. (1) An electric utility or natural gas utility shall not recover through rates any cost associated with any of the following: (a) Compensation or expense reimbursement for the utility's board of directors or officers. (b) Tax penalties, fines, or damage awards issued against the utility. (c) Travel, lodging, or food and beverage expenses for the utility's board of directors or officers. (d) Entertainment or gifts for the utility's board of directors or officers. (e) Any owned, leased, or chartered aircraft for the utility's board of directors or officers. (f) Investor relations. (g) Advertising, marketing, communication, or any other related costs that seek to influence public opinion, unless those marketing, advertising, communication, or related costs are specifically approved or ordered by the commission. (h) Lobbying. (i) Charitable contributions, including, but not limited to, contributions to organizations established under 26 USC 501(c)(3) or (4). (j) Membership, dues, sponsorships, or contributions to a business or industry trade association, group, or entity that engages in advertising and public relations, lobbying, or other similar activities intended to influence the outcome of any local, state, or federal legislation, ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, or ballot measure. (k) Contributions as that term is defined in section 4 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.204. (2) If the commission determines that a utility improperly recovered costs under subsection (1), the commission shall order the utility to refund to customers, with interest, any amount collected under subsection (1) and do all of the following: (a) For the first offense, pay a fine of not less than $1,000.00 or more than $20,000.00. (b) For a second offense, pay a fine of not more than 0.1% of the utility's annual revenue. (c) For a third and any subsequent offense, pay a fine of not less than 0.1% of the utility's annual revenue or more than 0.5% of the utility's annual revenue. (3) A fine ordered under subsection (2) must be deposited in the low-income energy assistance fund created in section 9t. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Advertising" means the act of publishing, disseminating, soliciting, or circulating written, online, video, or audio communication intended to induce an individual to patronize a product, service, business, or industry, to promote a business's brand, to emphasize desirable qualities about a product, service, business, or industry, or to influence public opinion with respect to legislative, administrative, or electoral matters. (b) "Lobbying" means directly, or through the solicitation of others, communicating with an individual who is in a position to make a policy decision in order to influence the outcome of local, state, or federal legislation, ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, or ballot measure. Lobbying does not include participation in a formal proceeding before the commission or a similar regulatory agency.